test/src/morphology/N-paarr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - paarr â-stem: # Noun 'pari' - full paradigm
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom: paarr
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill: pa′rre
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc: paarâst
     paarr+N+Sg+Com: paarin
     paarr+N+Ess: paarrân
     paarr+N+Par: paarrâd
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe: paartää
     paarr+N+Sg+Nom: paar
     paarr+N+Sg+Gen: paari
     paarr+N+Sg+Acc: paarid
     paarr+N+Sg+Ill: paarid
     paarr+N+Sg+Loc: paarin
     paarr+N+Sg+Com: paarivui′m
     paarr+N+Sg+Abe: paaritää
